Tennessee, session 114, SB1070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-2-101(q)(3)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B)
(i) For offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2019, but before July 1,
2025, in order to commence prosecution for an offense listed in subdivision (q)(1)
under the circumstances described in subdivision (q)(3)(A), at a date that is more
than twenty-five (25) years from the date the victim becomes eighteen (18) years
of age, the prosecution is required to offer admissible and credible evidence
corroborating the allegations or similar acts by the defendant.
(ii) For offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2025, in order to commence
prosecution for an offense listed in subdivision (q)(1) under the circumstances
described in subdivision (q)(3)(A), at a date that is more than thirty (30) years
from the date the victim becomes eighteen (18) years of age, the prosecution is
required to offer admissible and credible evidence corroborating the allegations
or similar acts by the defendant.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-2-101(q)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) This subsection (q) applies to offenses:
SB1070
002992
- 1 -

(A) Committed on or after July 1, 2019, except as provided in subdivision
(q)(3)(B); or
(B) Committed prior to July 1, 2019, unless prosecution for the offense is
barred because the applicable time limitation set out in this section for
prosecution of the offense expired prior to July 1, 2019.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 28-3-116(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "on or after July 1, 2019" and substituting "on or after July 1, 2019, but
before July 1, 2025".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 28-3-116(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(3) For child sexual abuse that occurred on or after July 1, 2025, within the later
of:
(A) Thirty (30) years from the date the person becomes eighteen (18)
years of age; or
(B) If the injury or illness was not discovered at the time of the abuse,
within three (3) years from the time of discovery of the abuse by the injured
person.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002992